Florida, session 2026, SB812.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (6) of 20 section 943.059, Florida Statutes, paragraph (a) of that 21 subsection is reenacted and amended, and paragraph (d) of that 22 subsection is reenacted, to read: 23 943.059âCourt-ordered sealing of criminal history records.â 24 (6)âEFFECT OF ORDER.â 25 (a)âA criminal history record of a minor or an adult which 26 is ordered sealed by a court pursuant to this section is 27 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 28 of the State Constitution and is available only to the following 29 persons: 30 1.âThe subject of the record; 31 2.âThe subjectâs attorney; 32 3.âCriminal justice agencies for their respective criminal 33 justice purposes, which include conducting a criminal history 34 background check for approval of firearms purchases or transfers 35 as authorized by state or federal law; 36 4.âA state attorney for the purpose of prosecuting any 37 subsequent cases. 38 5.âJudges in the state courts system for the purpose of 39 assisting them in their case-related decisionmaking 40 responsibilities, as set forth in s. 943.053(5); or 41 6.5.âTo those entities set forth in subparagraphs (b)1., 42 4.-6., and 8.-10. for their respective licensing access 43 authorization and employment purposes. 44 (d)âInformation relating to the existence of a sealed 45 criminal history record provided in accordance with paragraph 46 (b) is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 47 Art. I of the State Constitution, except that the department 48 shall disclose the sealed criminal history record to the 49 entities set forth in subparagraphs (b)1., 4.-6., and 8.-10. for 50 their respective licensing, access authorization, and employment 51 purposes. An employee of an entity set forth in subparagraph 52 (b)1., subparagraph (b)4., subparagraph (b)5., subparagraph 53 (b)6., subparagraph (b)8., subparagraph (b)9., or subparagraph 54 (b)10. may not disclose information relating to the existence of 55 a sealed criminal history record of a person seeking employment, 56 access authorization, or licensure with such entity or 57 contractor, except to the person to whom the criminal history 58 record relates or to persons having direct responsibility for 59 employment, access authorization, or licensure decisions. A 60 person who violates this paragraph commits a misdemeanor of the 61 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 62 775.083. 63 (e)âThe expansion of the public records exemption under 64 this subsection to include criminal history records described in 65 paragraph (1)(b) is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 66 Act in accordance with s. 119.15, and that paragraph shall stand 67 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 68 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. If the expansion 69 of the exemption is not saved from repeal, paragraph (1)(b) 70 reverts to that in existence on June 30, 2026, except that any 71 amendments to such text enacted other than by SB 810, 2026 72 Regular Session, are preserved and continue to operate to the 73 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions 74 of text which expire pursuant to this paragraph. This paragraph 75 expires October 31, 2031. 76 Section 2.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 77 replace the phrase âSB 810, 2026 Regular Sessionâ wherever it 78 occurs in this act with the assigned chapter number of that act. 79 Section 3.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 80 necessity that a criminal history record described in s. 81 943.059(1)(b), Florida Statutes, which is sealed be made 82 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 83 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution, and be made 84 available only in accordance with s. 943.059(6), Florida 85 Statutes. If a sealed criminal history record remains accessible 86 to potential employers, landlords, and other members of the 87 public, the person who obtained the sealing of the record faces 88 barriers to obtaining work, housing, or other resources 89 necessary to be a productive member of society. Increasing 90 opportunities for persons to seal a criminal history record 91 promotes economic stability, reduces crime and recidivism, and 92 makes communities safer. For these reasons, the Legislature 93 finds that it is a public necessity that the criminal history 94 record of persons adjudicated guilty of certain nonviolent 95 misdemeanor offenses be confidential and exempt from public 96 records requirements. 97 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 98 SB 810 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 99 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 100 thereof and becomes a law.